District of Columbia statutes.
22-3020.51

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Child” means an individual who has not yet attained the age of 16 years.

(2)

“Person” means an individual 18 years of age or older.

(3)

“Police” means the Metropolitan Police Department.

(4)

“Sexual abuse” means any act that is a violation of:

(A)

Section 22-1834;

(B)

Section § 22-2704;

(C)

This chapter (§ 22-3001 et seq.); or

(D)

Section 22-3102.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 251
as added June 8, 2013, D.C. Law 19-315, § 4, 60 DCR 1702
This section is referenced in § 2-1831.03 and § 4-1321.02.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-315 added this section.